Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.38.030

Out-of-state bank may maintain and operate branches—Powers and authorities.

(1) If authorized to engage in banking in this state under RCW 30A.38.010, an out-of-state bank may maintain and operate the branches in Washington of a Washington bank with which the out-of-state bank or its predecessors engaged in an interstate combination.

(2) The out-of-state bank may establish or acquire and operate additional branches in Washington to the same extent that any Washington bank may establish or acquire and operate a branch in Washington under applicable federal and state law.

(3) The out-of-state state bank may, at such branches, unless otherwise limited by the bank's home state law, exercise any powers and authorities that are authorized under the laws of this state for Washington state banks.

(4) The out-of-state state bank may, at these branches, exercise additional powers and authorities that are authorized under the laws of its home state, only if the director determines in writing that the exercise of the additional powers and authorities in this state will not threaten the safety and soundness of banks in this state and serves the convenience and needs of Washington consumers. Washington state banks also may exercise the powers and authorities under RCW * 30A.08.140(16) or ** 32.08.140(15).

[ 2014 c 37 s 209; 1996 c 2 s 13. Formerly RCW 30.38.030.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 30.08.140, which was subsequently recodified as RCW 30A.08.140 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, was amended by 2013 c 76 ss 9 and 10, deleting subsection (16).

**(2) RCW 32.08.140 was amended by 2013 c 76 ss 24 and 25, deleting subsection (15).